Massachusetts, session 194th, S1192.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 63 of chapter 277 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting at the end thereof the following paragraph:-
Notwithstanding the first paragraph, a prosecution for a sex offense, as defined in section
178C of chapter 6, may be commenced at any time if forensic evidence, as defined in section 220
of chapter 111, has been collected and preserved, and if such forensic evidence can be subjected
to DNA analysis, as defined in section 1 of chapter 22E, that can establish the identity of the
defendant.
of 1